Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-144
Department of Correctional Services-made goods; Department of Health and Human Services and Department of Correctional Services; administrative powers.

The Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Correctional Services shall administer the provisions of sections 83-144 to 83-152.

Laws 1935, c. 183, § 1, p. 678;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-956;

R.S.1943, § 83-144;

Laws 1963, c. 526, § 6, p. 1650;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 28;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 915.